Arkansas, session 2025, HB1380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-11-269 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-269. Review of information technology plans.
The Office of State Procurement shall ensure that all required
information has been submitted to the Office of Intergovernmental Services
Division of Information Systems for review of proper planning and technical
requirements before the execution of:
(1) A contract issued under this subchapter that procures
information technology products or services with a total projected contract
amount, including any amendments to or possible extensions of the contract,
of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); or
(2) A purchase of information technology products or services
made under a cooperative purchase agreement under § 19-11-249.
*JLL112*
02/02/2025 4:43:40 PM JLL112